Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6009
Negative trend,
with respect to a life and health insurer or
a fraternal benefit society, defined.

Negative
trend, with respect to a life and health insurer or a fraternal benefit society, means a negative
trend over a period of time, as determined in accordance with the trend test
calculation included in the life risk-based capital instructions.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 21;

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 36;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 14;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 29;

Laws 2013, LB426, § 4.